Hawaii statutes.
[§148-65]
Prohibited acts. No person shall:

(1) Use a seal of
quality established under this part without being licensed;

(2) Use a seal of
quality on a fresh or processed agricultural commodity that does not meet the
requirements of this part;

(3) Use a device,
symbol, indicia, or by any other means imitate the seal of quality established
by this part; or

(4) Make any
claim that a fresh or processed agricultural commodity is permitted to use a
seal of quality when it is not. [L 2002, c 163, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next